Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 7 COLORADO WORKS PROGRAM
26-2-712. State department duties - authority.

Plan submission. The state department shall submit and amend as necessary a plan to the secretary of the federal department of health and human services that is consistent with the provisions of this part 7 and federal law.

County block grant allocation.

The state department shall allocate the amount of moneys that shall be provided to a county as a county block grant for the purposes of a county's administration and implementation of the works program pursuant to section 26-2-714.

Except as provided in section 26-2-720.5, the county block grant shall represent the total amount that a county shall receive from the state for the administration and implementation of the Colorado works program.

Maintenance of effort. The state department shall monitor the state's progress toward meeting the levels of spending required under the federal law and section 26-2-713.

Performance measurements.

The state department shall develop performance goals and a formula for measuring a county's progress toward meeting such performance goals in administering and implementing the works program with county block grants. The state department shall provide data gathered on behalf of each county to the general assembly on a quarterly basis regarding employment- and training-related performance measures for the works program. Such data must include wages earned by works program participants upon leaving the program, job retention rates, and other related information. Such data must be provided through the state department's computerized systems, if available. Counties are not required to provide additional manual or computerized systems to gather such data. The state department shall work with the state work force development council to gather data on works program participants who participate in training and job placement programs offered by work force development boards and the result of such participation.

The formula may be based upon the formula developed by the secretary of the federal department of health and human services after consultation with the national governors' association and the American public welfare association for measuring states' performance under the TANF block grants.

Oversight. In connection with overseeing the works program, the specific duties of the state department are to:

Oversee the implementation of the works program statewide and, in connection with such oversight, develop standardized forms for the counties' use in streamlining the application process, delivery of services, and tracking of participants;

Monitor the state's progress in meeting the work participation requirements set forth in federal law;

Establish a process to implement the provisions for regionalization set forth in section 26-2-718 pursuant to which any combination of county departments may be approved by the state department to administer and implement the works program pursuant to the provisions of this part 7;

Establish statewide goals and monitor the state's progress toward meeting such goals for the reduction in the incidence of pregnancies of women and men who are not married;

Monitor the counties' provision of basic cash assistance grants pursuant to section 26-2-706.6 and, if necessary due to increased caseloads or economic downturns, do the following to ensure that the basic cash assistance grant is provided in a consistent manner statewide:

Grant moneys to one or more counties from the county block grant support fund administered pursuant to section 26-2-720.5; or

If no funds administered pursuant to section 26-2-720.5 are available:

Request supplemental appropriations from the general assembly, including but not limited to an appropriation from the Colorado long-term works reserve created pursuant to section 26-2-721; or

Reduce the county block grant of any county that maintains moneys in a county reserve account pursuant to section 26-2-714 (5) in order that moneys may be made available to one or more counties to avoid the need to reduce or eliminate the basic cash assistance grant statewide. If the state department makes a reduction in a county's reserve account pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B), the state department shall increase the county's block grant for the following fiscal year by the amount of the reduction authorized pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B); or

After taking the actions described in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (e), take any actions necessary to reduce the costs of, or reduce or eliminate, the basic cash assistance grant statewide.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1964, § 14, effective January 1, 2009.)

Colorado works program capacity building. The state department shall develop training for case workers and other service providers so that they are knowledgeable and may assist persons who receive assistance through the Colorado works program in:

Identifying goals, including work activities, time frames for achieving self-sufficiency, and the means required to meet these benchmarks;

Obtaining supportive services such as mental health counseling, substance abuse counseling, domestic violence services, life skills training, and money management and parenting classes;

Utilizing the family's existing strengths;

Providing ongoing support and assistance to the family in overcoming barriers to training and employment;

Monitoring the progress of the family toward attaining self-sufficiency;

Understanding and properly utilizing data reporting systems to report participation data and outcomes required by the state department; and

Providing opportunities for persons working with Colorado works participants to access professional-level curriculum to become proficient in assessing participant needs and developing individual plans to address those needs.

Domestic violence services training - rules.

To facilitate the proper identification, screening, and assessment of past and present victims of domestic violence who apply for or participate in the Colorado works program and to assist counties in complying with the provisions of this subsection (8) and section 26-2-708 (5), the state board shall promulgate rules that require the state department to provide ongoing domestic violence training and appropriate domestic violence training materials to county staff and to:

Assist counties in developing local resources and using available community resources to provide counseling and supportive services to past and present victims of domestic violence; and

Require counties to make applicants to and participants in the Colorado works program aware of the services and assistance provided by the state department pursuant to this subsection (8) and by the county.

The state department may contract with an individual or entity that has demonstrated expertise in the area of domestic violence assistance for the provision of the services specified in this subsection (8).

Waiver process.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (9), the governor and the state department, acting jointly, may grant a county's application for a waiver of any requirement of this part 7 or the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 7. Any waiver granted pursuant to this subsection (9) shall be designed to improve methods of achieving participants' self-sufficiency, meeting work participation rates and performance goals, or reducing dependency.

Any application for a waiver shall include a statement of the purpose of the waiver. The application shall be submitted to the governor and the state department no later than October 1 of the year immediately preceding the year in which the county intends to implement the waiver. The county shall provide notice of its application to all adjacent counties. The governor and the state department shall grant or deny the county's application no later than December 1 of the year in which the county applied. A waiver granted pursuant to this subsection (9) shall take effect on January 1 of the year immediately following approval of such waiver. The governor and the state department shall specify the duration of such waivers.

The state department and the governor shall not approve an application under this subsection (9) that proposes to waive any statute or rule governing statewide eligibility, the amount of the basic cash assistance grant, the county maintenance of effort, or any requirement of the federal law. The governor and the state department shall not approve an application under this subsection (9) that proposes to waive a participant's right to appeal a county determination under the works program, but they may approve the waiver of statutes or rules governing the method or procedure for such appeal.

The governor and the state department may approve any number of applications for waivers of one or more provisions of this part 7 or of the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 7, so long as such waivers meet the requirements of paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection (9).

In the event that the governor has reason to believe that a county's implementation of the works program pursuant to a waiver granted under this subsection (9) fails to satisfy the requirements of the federal law or is inconsistent with the purposes of the works program as set forth in section 26-2-705, the governor may revoke the waiver granted to the county and require the county to resume implementation of the works program pursuant to the provisions of this part 7 and the rules promulgated pursuant to this part 7.

In the event that the governor and the state department grant waivers to a county pursuant to this subsection (9), the performance contract entered into between the county and the state department pursuant to section 26-2-715 shall be amended to reflect the county's authority to implement the works program in accordance with the waivers granted and the governor's authority to revoke the waivers in accordance with paragraph (e) of this subsection (9).

Job market analysis. The state department, the department of labor and employment, and the state board for community colleges and occupational education created in section 23-60-104 (1)(b), C.R.S., shall annually analyze job market information in order to establish a compilation of the types of jobs most appropriate and likely to lead to long-term self-sufficiency for participants. As used in this subsection (10), "job market information" means any state or regional job market or labor data or statistics or any information related to state or regional labor trends that the department of labor and employment may have or to which it may have access.

Tuition voucher system.

The state department shall collaborate with the state board for community colleges and occupational education, created in section 23-60-104 (1)(b), C.R.S., to develop a tuition voucher system pursuant to which a participant may attend courses at an institution in the state's system of community and technical colleges by using a tuition voucher.

The state department and the state board for community colleges and occupational education, created in section 23-60-104 (1)(b), C.R.S., shall enter into a cooperative arrangement to make available appropriate educational and academic training programs for participants who receive tuition vouchers.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1204, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2001:

(4)(a) amended, p. 414, § 2, effective August 8; (9)(b) amended, p. 1174, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(7) amended, p. 1964, § 14, effective June 2; (4)(a) amended, p. 1291, § 6, effective July 1; (1), (2), (5)(a), (5)(b), (5)(e), (6), (8), and (9)(c) amended and (10) and (11) added, p. 1964, § 14, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2017:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1410, § 95, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

IP(5) and (5)(d) amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 756, § 17, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-2-713. State maintenance of effort.

The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from state funds for the works program which, together with the expenditures made by counties under the works program, shall be applied toward the state's maintenance of historic effort as specified in section 409 (a)(7) of the social security act.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1208, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 280, § 2, effective March 31.

26-2-714. County block grants formula - use of money - rules.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1967, § 15, effective January 1, 2009.)

(1.5) Moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the county block grant line shall remain appropriated and available to counties pursuant to the procedures specified in this section.

Subject to available appropriations, in state fiscal year 2009-10 and in each fiscal year thereafter, the state department, with input from the works allocation committee, shall set the amount of the county block grants based on demographic and economic factors within the counties, including the amount a county spends on basic cash assistance grants and the county's TANF reserve balance.

(2.5) In the event that the state department and the works allocation committee do not reach an agreement in setting the amounts of the county block grants pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section on or before June 15 of each state fiscal year, the works allocation committee shall submit alternatives to the joint budget committee of the general assembly from which the joint budget committee shall identify each individual county's block grant for the state fiscal year commencing on the immediately succeeding July 1.

Nothing in subsections (2) and (2.5) of this section shall prevent a county from transferring at any time during the fiscal year, pursuant to procedures established by the state department and the works allocation committee, a portion of the county's current federal TANF allocation to another county in exchange for an amount of county moneys equal to the maintenance of effort associated with the allocation.

The state department shall identify the portion of moneys in the county block grant that may be spent on administrative costs.

A county shall be authorized to maintain a reserve account of county block grant moneys pursuant to rules promulgated by the state department.

Pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (V) of paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of this section, upon the conclusion of state fiscal year 2010-11, and upon the conclusion of each state fiscal year thereafter, the works allocation committee may transfer to another county on or before November 1 of the succeeding fiscal year, any unspent county TANF reserves in excess of forty percent of the county's county block grant for the concluding state fiscal year. TANF reserves transferred to a county pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B) shall be available to the county in the succeeding state fiscal year.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-124), ch. 183, p. 695, § 1, effective May 19, 2011.)

If the works allocation committee transfers excess unspent TANF reserves pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (I), the county from which the reserves are transferred shall receive appropriate maintenance of effort credit for those reserves. The county receiving the TANF reserves shall be responsible for providing an amount of county moneys equal to the maintenance of effort associated with the TANF reserves.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-124), ch. 183, p. 695, § 1, effective May 19, 2011.)

A county shall be required to maintain in such county's social services fund created pursuant to section 26-1-123 any county funds that were appropriated pursuant to section 26-2-716 (1)(a) and section 26-1-122 (6) in order to meet the targeted spending level required pursuant to subsection (6) of this section but not actually expended on the works program during the state fiscal year for which the county appropriated such funds.

(5.5) (a) The state department is authorized to segregate county block grant funds allocated under this section.

If the state department segregates county block grant funds as authorized under this subsection (5.5):

County departments shall report to the state expenditures they have made in a segregated manner, according to rules promulgated by the state board in accordance with applicable federal law;

The counties shall develop policies regarding the use of segregated funds under this subsection (5.5);

Funds shall be segregated in order to ensure maximum flexibility and to allow counties to provide additional assistance or services, in accordance with federal law.

Repealed.

The state board shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement this subsection (5.5).

Targeted spending levels. For state fiscal year 1997-98 and each state fiscal year thereafter, a county's targeted spending level shall be an amount that meets or exceeds one hundred percent of the county's spending on AFDC, JOBS, and the administrative costs related to those programs in state fiscal year 1995-96.

Repealed.

Actual spending levels - 1998-99 and thereafter. (I) For state fiscal year 1998-99 and for each state fiscal year thereafter, all counties collectively shall be required to meet levels of spending on the works program that are set forth in the annual long appropriation act, subject to the provisions of subsection (8) of this section.

(II) For state fiscal year 1998-99 and for each state fiscal year thereafter, each county's actual level of spending shall be identified by the works allocation committee created in subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c) no later than June 15 of each state fiscal year for the immediately succeeding state fiscal year. Prior to determining each county's actual spending level, the works allocation committee shall ensure that all counties have been notified of the recommended actual spending level and given an opportunity to provide comment on the recommendation. In the event that the works allocation committee does not reach an agreement on each individual county's actual level of spending for a state fiscal year on or before June 15 of such prior state fiscal year, the committee shall submit alternatives to the joint budget committee of the general assembly from which such joint budget committee shall identify each individual county's level of spending for a state fiscal year. The amount identified for a county's level of spending shall be identified in the county's performance contract with the state department entered into pursuant to section 26-2-715.

(III) The works allocation committee shall also identify the amount of mitigation that shall be allocated for a small county in accordance with the provisions of subsection (8) of this section. The works allocation committee may create a subcommittee that represents the interests of small counties as defined in subsection (8) of this section, which subcommittee may make recommendations concerning the mitigation amounts to be allocated for a small county pursuant to the provisions of subsection (8) of this section.

(IV) There is hereby created the works allocation committee that shall consist of eleven members, eight of whom shall be appointed by a statewide association of counties and three of whom shall be appointed by the state department. Of the members appointed by the statewide association of counties, at least two members shall be from small or medium-sized counties, and at least three shall be from large counties. The appointing authorities shall consult with each other to ensure that the works allocation committee is representative of the counties in the state. A representative from the county that has the greatest percentage of the state's works caseload will automatically be appointed, which appointment shall be credited against the eight appointments allocated to the statewide association of counties. The works allocation committee shall develop its own operational procedures.

(V) The works allocation committee shall determine the priority criteria for transfers of excess unspent TANF reserves to a county pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section and the amount of the transfers. With the goal of increasing the counties' minimum percentage reserve balances, the works allocation committee's priority criteria shall give first priority to transfers to counties that have no more than a ten percent balance in the county's TANF reserve account. If moneys remain after satisfying the first priority criterion, second priority shall be given to transfers to those counties whose TANF reserves are more than ten percent, but no more than twenty percent.

The county may transfer any amount of the county block grant that is designated as federal funds and that is specified by the state department as being available for transfer within the limitation imposed by the federal law on transfers of federal funds from the temporary assistance for needy families block grant to the child care development fund if child care funds are not available.

As used in this subsection (8), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Annual maximum mitigation amount" means that portion of the total amount of county funds identified in the annual long appropriation act that may be used for mitigation for small counties in that state fiscal year.

"Mitigation" means a specific reduction in a county's targeted spending level established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of this section or a specific reduction in a county's actual spending level established pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of this section that is authorized pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (8). Mitigation can occur for targeted spending levels or actual spending levels or for both types of spending levels.

"Small county" means a county with less than thirty-eight one hundredths of one percent of the total caseload of the works program statewide. The state department, with input from the works allocation committee, shall determine what shall constitute the total caseload of the works program and the time at which such caseload shall be established.

Subject to the identification of an annual maximum mitigation amount in the annual long appropriation act and the criteria identified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (8), the works allocation committee created pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of this section is authorized to identify the amount or amounts of any mitigation that shall be allocated to a small county in a specific state fiscal year. The works allocation committee shall notify the state department of any agreement concerning the allocation of any annual maximum mitigation amount in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (8).

The criteria that the works allocation committee shall use include but are not limited to the following:

The assessment of the equity of a small county's total program expenditures as they relate to the targeted or actual spending level for the small county;

The extent to which the small county will have insufficient revenues to meet its targeted or actual spending level; and

The extent to which the provision of any mitigation may enhance the efforts of a small county or group of small counties to regionalize pursuant to the provisions of section 26-2-718.

For state fiscal year 1997-98, and for each state fiscal year thereafter, a county may transfer any amount of the county block grant that is designated as federal funds and that is specified by the state department as being available for transfer within the limitation imposed by the federal law on transfers of federal funds from the temporary assistance for needy families block grant to programs funded by Title XX of the federal social security act.

A county may make the transfer authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) only for expenditures that are allowable under programs funded by Title XX of the federal social security act, subject to the following provisions:

If the funds transferred are used for the provision of child welfare services as defined in section 26-5-101 (3), the county may only make the transfer:

After the county has made allowable expenditures of all funds in the county's capped or targeted allocation or allocations for child welfare services, other than for core services as referred to in section 26-5-101 (3)(f); and

For the expenditures for child welfare services other than out-of-home placement services as described in section 26-5-101 (3)(i).

A county shall not be required to appropriate funds to provide a county match pursuant to the provisions of section 26-1-122 for any funds transferred pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (9).

A county shall not be authorized to use funds transferred pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (9) for the purpose of supplanting funds that:

The county would otherwise be required to appropriate pursuant to section 26-1-122 in order to provide a county match for public assistance programs; or

The county would otherwise appropriate in order to continue the provision of services under a program of public assistance administered with county only funds in the prior fiscal year.

The state board shall promulgate rules governing procedures for transfers authorized pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (9).

A county may make a transfer authorized by subsection (9)(a) of this section, within the limitations imposed by state and federal law on such transfers, in order to fund various programs for the improvement of child care. The transfers may be used for minor remodeling of licensed child care facilities or facilities legally exempt from licensing requirements pursuant to section 26.5-5-304, including but not limited to physical modifications for the purpose of licensure or accreditation, construction or improvement of fencing or other safety and security fixtures or other uses not prohibited under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1397d.

If the state meets federal work participation rates and qualifies for a percent reduction in the state's maintenance of effort as specified in federal law for any year, the actual spending level for the works program of all counties collectively shall be reduced by the same amount as the amount of the reduction in the federal maintenance of effort requirement.

For the purposes of this subsection (10), "percent reduction" means the percent of reduction of historical expenditures as that term is defined in section 409 (7)(b) of the federal social security act, as amended.

For any year in which a percent reduction in the state's maintenance of effort requirement occurs, the works allocation committee created pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of this section shall determine each county's share of the reduction in actual spending levels. Prior to making such determination, the works allocation committee shall ensure that all counties have been notified of the recommended reduction for each county and given an opportunity to provide comment on the recommendation. In the event that the works allocation committee does not reach an agreement on each individual county's reduction in actual spending levels, the committee shall submit alternatives to the joint budget committee of the general assembly from which such joint budget committee shall identify each individual county's reduction in actual spending levels. The state department is authorized to adjust each county's share of the reduction in actual spending levels. The state department is authorized to adjust each county's actual spending level for any percentage reduction earned in accordance with the determination of the works allocation committee concerning each county's share of the reduction.

The works allocation committee shall:

Review, at least quarterly, the balance of the Colorado long-term works reserve, the balance of the total statewide county TANF reserve, and the amount of basic cash assistance grants provided to participants to monitor whether the balance of the Colorado long-term works reserve will fall below twenty-five percent of the state block grant amount and whether the balance of the total statewide county TANF reserve will fall below fifteen percent of the county block grant amount;

Submit a written report to the joint budget committee detailing the current Colorado long-term works reserve level, the total statewide county TANF reserve level as a whole and by county, and any projections regarding deficits in the reserves; and

Establish a mitigation fund for counties whose TANF reserves fall below fifteen percent of the county's block grant amount.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1208, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(9) added, p. 779, § 1, effective May 22; (2), (5), and (6) amended and (2.5) and (8) added, p. 1192, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(2), (5)(a), (6)(c)(II), (7), (8)(a)(II), (8)(c), and (9)(a) amended and (10) added, p. 280, § 3, effective March 31; (9)(c) added, p. 36, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2002:

(5.5) added, p. 141, § 1, effective March 27; (5)(a) amended, p. 281, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5)(a) amended, p. 369, § 1, effective July 1; (6)(b) repealed, p. 204, § 24, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(5.5)(c) repealed, p. 123, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1), (2), (2.5), and (5)(a) amended, p. 1967, § 15, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2011:

(1.5) and (6)(c)(V) added and (3) and (5)(a) amended, (SB 11-124), ch. 183, pp. 695, 697, §§ 1, 2, effective May 19.

L. 2013:

(6)(c)(IV), (HB 13-1087), ch. 37, p. 106, § 2, effective March 15.

L. 2022:

(2) amended and (11) added, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2487, § 9, effective June 3; (9)(d) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 857, § 95, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-714.5. Adjusted work participation rate - notification - county authorization - career and technical education.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "federal credit" means the caseload reduction credit as calculated pursuant to 45 CFR 261.40 or any employment credit, caseload reduction credit, or other credit against such rate for a fiscal year that may be subsequently adopted by the federal government.

The state department shall notify each county, within thirty days after the beginning of the state fiscal year, of the state department's projection regarding the adjusted rate that the state must attain for the fiscal year in order to be in compliance with federal requirements, based on the state's estimate of the federal credit the state anticipates qualifying to receive. This adjusted rate shall be the county's adjusted work participation rate for that state fiscal year.

Each county is authorized to place participants in career and technical education, as that term is defined by rule of the state board, for longer than twelve months in order to meet critical skills shortages in the labor market; except that the percentage of participants allowed to satisfy program requirements through career and technical education of longer than twelve months in a county shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the state's estimate of the federal credit.

The provisions of this section shall be implemented by the state department consistent with the requirement of section 26-2-715 (1)(a)(III).

The state department may suspend a county's ability to place participants in career and technical education for longer than twelve months if the state department certifies that allowing career and technical education to count toward a works participant's required work activities would affect the state's ability to meet federal work participation rates.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 89, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 2017:

(3) and (5) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1410, § 96, effective May 25.

26-2-714.7. Work participation rates - increases - county strategies - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1522, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) and (1)(f) amended, p. 1969, § 16, effective January 1, 2009.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2010. (See L. 2007, p. 1522.)

26-2-715. Performance contracts.

Each county, either acting singly or with a group of counties, shall enter into an annual performance contract with the state department that shall identify the county's or group of counties' duties and responsibilities in implementing the works program. The performance contract must include but need not be limited to:

Requirements and provisions that address the county's or group of counties' duty to administer and implement the works program using fair and objective criteria;

Provisions that prohibit the county or group of counties from reducing the basic cash assistance grant administered pursuant to section 26-2-709 and monitored by the state department pursuant to section 26-2-711 and provisions that prohibit the county or group of counties from restricting eligibility or the provision of services or imposing sanctions in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this part 7 or the provisions in the state plan submitted to the secretary of the federal department of health and human services pursuant to section 26-2-712;

Work participation rates for the county or group of counties that shall ensure that the state will be able to meet or exceed its work participation rates under the federal law.

A county or group of counties may be sanctioned for not meeting any obligation under such performance contract. Such sanctions must be identified in the performance contract and may include a reduction in a future county block grant allocation.

The performance contract shall set forth the circumstances under which the state department may elect that it or its agent assume the county's or group of counties' administration and implementation of the works program.

If the state department and the county or group of counties are unable to reach agreement on the contract, either party may request the state board to consider the matter, and the state board shall schedule the matter for hearing within thirty days after receipt of the request. The state board shall issue a decision on the matter which shall be considered binding on all parties. If necessary to assure services are available within the county or group of counties, the state department may enter into a temporary agreement with the county or group of counties or with another public or private agent until the matter is resolved by the state board.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1209, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(II) amended, p. 1969, § 17, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), and (2) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 857, § 96, effective July 1.